Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10A‑105.5] Federal
law compliance. An accident and health or sickness insurer shall comply
with applicable federal law. The commissioner shall enforce the consumer
protections and market reforms relating to insurance as set forth in the
federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, Public Law 111-148. [L
2011, c 15, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next